North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-24.1 Medical Marijuana
19-24.1-37.
Confidentiality.

Except as provided under subsection 2, information kept or maintained by the department is confidential, including information in a registration application or renewal and supporting information submitted by a qualifying patient, designated caregiver, compassion center, proposed compassion center, or compassion center agent, including information on designated caregivers and health care providers.

Information kept or maintained by the department may be disclosed as necessary for:

The verification of registration certificates and registry identification cards under this chapter;

Submission of the annual report required by this chapter;

Submission to the North Dakota prescription drug monitoring program;

Notification of state or local law enforcement of apparent criminal violation;

Notification of state and local law enforcement about falsified or fraudulent information submitted for purposes of obtaining or renewing a registry identification card;

Notification of the North Dakota board of medicine or North Dakota board of nursing if there is a reason to believe a health care provider provided a written certification and the department has reason to believe the health care provider otherwise violated this chapter; or

Data for statistical purposes in a manner such that an individual or compassion center is not identified.

Upon a cardholder’s written request, the department may confirm the cardholder’s status as a registered qualifying patient or a registered designated caregiver to a third party, such as a landlord, school, medical professional, or court.

Information submitted to a local government to demonstrate compliance with any security requirements required by local zoning ordinances or regulations is confidential.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 191, § 8, effective April 24, 2019; 2021, ch. 172, § 22, effective May 3, 2021.

19-24.1-38.
Advisory board.

The governor shall appoint six members to serve on an advisory board as follows:

One health care provider;

One representative of the department;

One representative of the manufacturing facilities;

One representative of the dispensaries;

One registered qualifying patient; and

One licensed pharmacist.

The chairman of the legislative management shall appoint two members of the legislative assembly to serve on the advisory board, one member from each chamber. The legislative council shall pay the compensation and expense reimbursement for the legislative members. The terms of members of the appointed advisory board are for two years and members may be reappointed by the appointing entity. The state health officer shall serve as an ex officio voting member and as chairman of the advisory board.

The advisory board:

Shall advise the department in implementation of the medical marijuana program.

May receive reports from the department on the status and activities of the medical marijuana program.

May provide recommendations to the department and the legislative management on the medical marijuana program.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2021, ch. 180, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 180, S.L. 2021, provides: “

APPLICATION.

The governor shall implement the membership of the medical marijuana advisory board on the effective date of this Act.”

19-24.1-39.
Report to legislative management.

Annually, the department shall submit to the legislative management a report that does not disclose any identifying information about registered cardholders, compassion centers, or health care providers, but contains the following information:

The number of registry identification card applications and renewals;

The number of registered qualifying patients, registered designated caregivers, and registered compassion center agents;

The nature of the debilitating medical conditions of the registered qualifying patients;

The number of registry identification cards revoked;

The number of health care providers providing written certifications for qualifying patients;

The number of compassion centers;

Any expenses incurred and revenues generated by the department from the medical marijuana program; and

Data for statistical purposes in a manner so that an individual person is not identifiable.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2021, ch. 172, § 23, effective May 3, 2021.

19-24.1-40.
Medical marijuana fund — Continuing appropriation.

The medical marijuana fund is established in the state treasury. The department shall deposit in the fund all fees collected under this chapter. The department shall administer the fund. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for use in administering this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.